Missouri, session 2026, SB1397.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 644.057, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
644.057 and 644.083, to read as follows:
644.057. Notwithstanding any statutory fee amounts or
maximums to the contrary, the director of the department of
natural resources may conduct a comprehensive review and
propose changes to the clean water fee structure set forth
in sections 644.052, 644.053, and 644.061. The
comprehensive review shall include stakeholder meetings in
order to solicit stakeholder input from each of the
following groups: agriculture, industry, municipalities,
public and private wastewater facilities, and the
development community. Upon completion of the comprehensive
review, the department shall submit a proposed fee structure
with stakeholder agreement to the clean water commission.
The commission shall review such recommendations at the
forthcoming regular or special meeting, but shall not vote
on the fee structure until a subsequent meeting. [In no
case shall the clean water commission adopt or recommend any
clean water fee in excess of five thousand dollars.] If the
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1397 2
commission approves, by vote of two-thirds majority or five
of seven commissioners, the fee structure recommendations,
the commission shall authorize the department to file a
notice of proposed rulemaking containing the recommended fee
structure, and after considering public comments, may
authorize the department to file the order of rulemaking for
such rule with the joint committee on administrative rules
pursuant to sections 536.021 and 536.024 no later than
December first of the same year. If such rules are not
disapproved by the general assembly in the manner set out
below, they shall take effect on January first of the
following calendar year and the fee structures set forth in
sections 644.052, 644.053, and 644.061 shall expire upon the
effective date of the commission-adopted fee structure,
contrary to section 644.054. Any regulation promulgated
under this subsection shall be deemed to be beyond the scope
and authority provided in this subsection, or detrimental to
permit applicants, if the general assembly, within the first
sixty calendar days of the regular session immediately
following the filing of such regulation disapproves the
regulation by concurrent resolution. If the general
assembly so disapproves any regulation filed under this
subsection, the department and the commission shall not
implement the proposed fee structure and shall continue to
use the previous fee structure. The authority of the
commission to further revise the fee structure provided by
this section shall expire on August 28, 2030. If the
commission's authority to revise the fee structure as
provided by this section expires, the fee structure in place
at the time of expiration shall remain in place.
644.083. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
the contrary, a person who has contracted for the right to

SB 1397 3
store water in a reservoir owned by the United States Army
Corps of Engineers shall have exclusive rights to any return
flows generated directly or indirectly to that reservoir by
the person. The rights under by this section shall be
subject to regulatory requirements imposed by the state and
to the availability to the person of unused storage capacity
within the reservoir to store such return flows.
2. For purposes of this section, "return flow" means
water that is discharged directly or indirectly to a
reservoir from a water reclamation facility.
✓